pl: Typ podpórki: Zacisk; Kołyska; Widelec; Brak / płaska podpora; Montaż Picatinny; Siodło; Podpora typu U; Podpora typu V; Inne
fr: Type de fourche: Pince; Berceau; Fourche; Aucun/support plat; Monture Picatinny; Selle; Support en U; Support en V; Autre
hu: Fegyvertartó típusa: Bilincs; Bölcső; Villa; Nincs/lapos tartó; Picatinny szerelék; Nyereg; U-tartó; V-tartó; Egyéb
tr: Yoke tipi: Kelepçe; Beşik; Çatal; Yok/düz destek; Picatinny bağlantısı; Eyer; U çatal; V çatal; Diğer
bg-BG: Тип вилка: Скоба; Люлка; Вилка; Без/плоска опора; Монтаж Picatinny; Седло; U-образна опора; V-образна опора; Други
lt-LT: Jungo tipas: Spaustuvas; Lopšys; Šakė; Nėra / plokščia atrama; „Picatinny“ laikiklis; Balnelis; U formos atrama; V formos atrama; Kita
th: ประเภทของโครงยึด: แคลมป์; แท่นรับ; ง่าม; ไม่มี/แท่นวางแบนเรียบ; เมาท์ Picatinny; อาน; แอกรูปตัว U; แอกรูปตัว V; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di giogo: Morsetto; Culla; Forcella; Nessuno/appoggio piatto; Attacco Picatinny; Sella; Supporto a U; Supporto a V; Altro
el: Τύπος βάσης στήριξης (ζυγού): Σφιγκτήρας; Βάση υποδοχής; Πιρούνι; Κανένα/επίπεδη βάση; Βάση Picatinny; Σέλα; Δίχαλο U; Δίχαλο V; Άλλο
en: Yoke type: Clamp; Cradle; Fork; None/flat rest; Picatinny mount; Saddle; U yoke; V yoke; Other
fi: Haarukkatyyppi: Puristin; Kehto; Haarukka; Ei mitään / litteä tuki; Picatinny-kiinnike; Satula; U-tuki; V-tuki; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de apoio: Abraçadeira; Berço; Garfo; Nenhum/apoio plano; Suporte Picatinny; Sela; Apoio em U; Apoio em V; Outros
da: Gaffeltype: Klemme; Vugge; Gaffel; Ingen/flad støtte; Picatinny-montering; Sadel; U-gaffel; V-gaffel; Andet
zh-CN: 轭架类型: 夹具; 托架; 叉形支架; 无/平托; 皮卡汀尼导轨底座; 鞍座; U 型支架; V 型支架; 其他
nb: Type rifleholder: Klemme; Vugge; Gaffel; Ingen / flat støtte; Picatinny-feste; Sadel; U-gaffel; V-gaffel; Annet
vi: Loại gá: Kẹp; Giá đỡ ôm; Chạc; Không có/giá đỡ phẳng; Ngàm Picatinny; Giá đỡ dạng yên; Giá đỡ chữ U; Giá đỡ chữ V; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de berço/suporte: Braçadeira; Suporte em berço; Forquilha; Nenhum/apoio plano; Suporte Picatinny; Selim; Forquilha em U; Forquilha em V; Outro
de: Jochtyp: Klemme; Wiege; Gabel; Keine/Flache Auflage; Picatinny-Halterung; Sattel; U-Auflage; V-Auflage; Sonstige
nl: Type juk: Klem; Wieg; Vork; Geen/platte steun; Picatinny-montage; Zadel; U-steun; V-steun; Overig
es: Tipo de horquilla: Abrazadera; Soporte; Horquilla; Ninguno/apoyo plano; Montura Picatinny; Asiento; Yugo en U; Yugo en V; Otro
zh-TW: 托架類型: 夾具; 托架; 叉型架; 無/平坦支架; 皮卡汀尼導軌安裝座; 鞍座; U 型托架; V 型托架; 其他
ru: Тип вилки/опоры: Зажим; Люлька; Вилка; Нет / плоский упор; Крепление Пикатинни; Седло; U-образная вилка; V-образная вилка; Другой
hr-HR: Vrsta jarma: Stezaljka; Ležište; Vilica; Ništa / ravni naslon; Picatinny nosač; Sedlo; Naslon u obliku slova U; Naslon u obliku slova V; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta jahača: Sponka; Zibelka; Vilice; Brez/ravni naslon; Nastavek Picatinny; Sedlo; Naslon U; Naslon V; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ vidlice: Svorka; Kolíska; Vidlica; Žiadny/plochá opierka; Držiak Picatinny; Sedlo; U-opierka; V-opierka; Iné
cs: Typ vidlice: Svorka; Kolébka; Vidlice; Žádný / plochá opěrka; Montáž Picatinny; Sedlo; Třmen ve tvaru U; Třmen ve tvaru V; Jiné
ja: ヨークタイプ: クランプ; クレードル; フォーク; なし/フラットレスト; ピカティニーマウント; サドル; U 字ヨーク; V 字ヨーク; その他
ro-RO: Tipul jugului: Clemă; Suport; Furcă; Fără/suport plat; Suport Picatinny; Șa; Formă de U; Formă de V; Altele
ko: 요크 유형: 클램프; 크래들; 포크; 없음/평면 받침대; 피카티니 마운트; 안장; U자형 요크; V자형 요크; 기타
sv: Oktyp: Klämma; Vagga; Gaffel; Ingen/platt stöd; Picatinny-fäste; Sadel; U-format ok; V-format ok; Övrigt